Missouri, session 2026, SB1405.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 345.050, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 345.050,
to read as follows:
345.050. To be eligible for licensure by the board by
examination, each applicant shall submit the application fee
and shall furnish evidence of such person's current
competence and shall:
(1) Hold a master's or a doctoral degree from a
program that was awarded "accreditation candidate" status or
is accredited by the Council on Academic Accreditation of
the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association or other
accrediting agency approved by the board in the area in
which licensure is sought;
(2) Submit official transcripts from one or more
accredited colleges or universities presenting evidence of
the completion of course work and clinical practicum
requirements equivalent to that required by the Council on
Academic Accreditation of the American Speech-Language-
Hearing Association or other accrediting agency approved by
the board;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1405 2
(3) Present written evidence of completion of a
clinical fellowship from supervisors. The experience
required by this subdivision shall follow the completion of
the requirements of subdivisions (1) and (2) of this
section. This period of employment shall be under the
direct supervision of a [person who is licensed by the state
of Missouri in the profession in which the applicant seeks
to be] licensed speech-language pathologist in good
standing. Persons applying with an audiology clinical
doctoral degree are exempt from this provision; and
(4) Pass an examination promulgated or approved by the
board. The board shall determine the subject and scope of
the examinations.
✓